Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB428.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 177.240 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Transportation Cabinet and any highway authorities of a[the state,] county
or[,] city[, and town] are authorized to[ so] design any limited access facility and
to[ so] regulate, restrict, or prohibit access as to best serve the traffic for which
the[such] facility is intended, and its determination of the[such] design shall be
final.
(2) In exercising its powers under subsection (1) of this section, the cabinet or county
or city highway authority may:[In this connection, such highway authorities are
authorized to ]
(a) Divide and separate any limited access facility into separate roadways by the
construction of raised curbings, central dividing sections, or other physical
separations; and
(b) Designate these[, or by designating such] separate roadways by using signs,
markers, stripes, and other traffic control devices to identify the proper lane
for[ such] traffic[ by appropriate signs, markers, stripes, and other devices].
(3) (a) A[No] person shall not have any right of ingress or egress to, from, or across
limited access facilities to or from abutting lands, except:
1. At such designated points at which access may be permitted; and
2. Subject to the limitations in paragraph (b) of this subsection, upon
such terms and conditions as may be specified by the cabinet or county
or city highway authority that maintains the limited access
facility[from time to time].
(b) The cabinet or county or city highway authority that maintains a limited
access facility, in granting access to a limited access facility, shall not
require the property owner to pay compensation for any increase in value to
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 2/3/2025 12:36 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1438
the affected property attributable to the new access based on before and
after property appraisals.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 2/3/2025 12:36 PM Jacketed